District of Columbia statutes.
38-1122

Board of Vocational Education — Composition; appointment; compensation; removal; liability.

(a)

The Washington Technical Institute shall be under the control of a Board of Vocational Education which shall consist of 9 members appointed by the President of the United States. Of the 9 members, at least 6 shall be selected from industry. The members of the Vocational Board shall select a chairman from among their own number. The members of the Vocational Board shall be appointed for terms of 3 years; except that the terms of office of the members 1st taking office shall expire, as designated by the President at the time of appointment, 3 at the end of 1 year, 3 at the end of 2 years, and 3 at the end of 3 years. Any member appointed to fill a vacancy occurring prior to the expiration of the term for which his predecessor was appointed shall be appointed for the remainder of that term. A vacancy in the Vocational Board shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment was made. Members of the Vocational Board shall serve without compensation, but may be reimbursed for their travel expenses, including per diem in lieu of subsistence, as authorized by § 5703 of Title 5, United States Code, for persons serving the government without compensation.

(b)

The President of the United States may remove, in accordance with the provisions of this subsection, any member of the Vocational Board for adequate cause affecting his character and efficiency as a member. If the President determines that, with respect to any such member, there is adequate cause affecting his character and efficiency as a member, the President may appoint a special investigating board, consisting of not more than 3 members, to consider the matter. The investigating board, in considering such matter, shall hold public hearings and, on the basis thereof, report to the President with respect to their findings of fact and recommendations. Following the receipt by him of such report, the President may remove such member from office.

(c)

The members of the Vocational Board shall not be personally liable in damages for any official action of the Vocational Board in which such members participate, nor shall they be liable for any costs that may be taxed against them or the Vocational Board on account of any such official action by them as members of the Vocational Board, but such costs shall be charged to the District of Columbia and paid as other costs are paid in suits against the municipality; nor shall the Vocational Board or any of its members be required to give any bond or security for costs or damages on any appeal whatever.

Nov. 7, 1966, 80 Stat. 1430, Pub. L. 89-791, title II, § 202
Abolition of Vocational Board, see § 38-1202.08.
This section is referenced in § 38-1121 and § 38-1201.03.
1981 Ed., § 31-1422.
1973 Ed., § 31-1622.
The Board of Higher Education and the Vocational Board were abolished on the day the Board of Trustees of the University of the District of Columbia convened its first meeting. See § 38-1202.08.